Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.100

District judges—Vacancies—Remuneration.

(1) If a district judge dies, resigns, is convicted of a felony, ceases to reside in the district, fails to serve for any reason except temporary disability, or if his or her term of office is terminated in any other manner, the office shall be deemed vacant. The county legislative authority shall fill all vacancies by appointment and the judge thus appointed shall hold office until the next general election and until a successor is elected and qualified. However, if a vacancy in the office of district court judge occurs and the total number of district court judges remaining in the county is equal to or greater than the number of district court judges authorized in RCW 3.34.010 then the position shall remain vacant. District judges shall be granted sick leave in the same manner as other county employees. A district judge may receive when vacating office remuneration for unused accumulated leave and sick leave at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation for each full day of accrued leave and one day's monetary compensation for each four full days of accrued sick leave, the total remuneration for leave and sick leave not to exceed the equivalent of thirty days' monetary compensation.

(2) During any vacancy that occurs pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in a single judge court, a presiding judge pro tempore who has been predesignated pursuant to court rule or appointed pursuant to RCW 2.56.040(2) may fulfill presiding judge duties, and the authority of the predesignated or appointed presiding judge pro tempore endures until the chief justice appoints someone else to fulfill the presiding judge duties pursuant to RCW 2.56.040(2)(b), or until a vacancy in the position is filled as provided by law, whichever occurs first.

[ 2022 c 74 s 6; 2003 c 97 s 3; 1992 c 76 s 1; 1984 c 258 s 16; 1961 c 299 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 97: See note following RCW 3.34.010.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.